North Carolina, session 2025, SB712.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

INCOME TAX EXEMPTION
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 105-153.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.7. Individual income tax imposed.
(a) Tax. – A tax is imposed for each taxable year on the North Carolina taxable income
of every individual. The tax shall be levied, collected, and paid annually. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (a1) of this section, the tax is a percentage of the taxpayer's North Carolina
taxable income computed as follows:shall be computed at the following percentages of the
taxpayer's income for taxable year 2025 and computed at the following percentage reduced by
twenty-six hundredths percent (0.26%) for taxable years after 2025:
Taxable Years Beginning Tax
In 2022 4.99%
In 2023 4.75%
In 2024 4.5%
In 2025 4.25%
After 2025 3.99%.
(1) For married individuals who file a joint return under G.S. 105-153.8 and for
surviving spouses, as defined in section 2(a) of the Code:
Over Up To Rate
-0- 1,000,000 4.25%
$1,000,000 NA 5.05%
(2) For heads of households, as defined in section 2(b) of the Code:
Over Up To Rate
-0- $800,000 4.25%
$800,000 NA 5.05%
(3) For unmarried individuals other than surviving spouses and heads of
households:
Over Up To Rate
-0- 600,000 4.25%
$600,000 NA 5.05%
(4) For married individuals who do not file a joint return under G.S. 105-153.8:
Over Up To Rate
-0- 500,000 4.25%
*S712-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
$500,000 NA 5.05%
(a1) Rate Reduction Trigger. – Notwithstanding the tax rates set out in subsection (a) of
this section, if total General Fund revenue in a fiscal year set out below exceeds the trigger
amount indicated for that fiscal year, then the applicable tax rate for the indicated and subsequent
tax years shall be equal to the greater of (i) the prior taxable year's rate decreased by one-half
percentage point (0.50%) or (ii) two and forty-nine hundredths percent (2.49%). For purposes of
this subsection, total General Fund revenue is the amount stated in the final accounting of total
General Fund Reverting Net Tax and Non-Tax Revenues for the fiscal year, as reported by the
Office of State Controller in August following the end of the fiscal year.
Fiscal Year Trigger Amount Taxable Year Beginning
FY 2025-2026 $33,042,000,000 In 2027
FY 2026-2027 $34,100,000,000 In 2028
FY 2027-2028 $34,760,000,000 In 2029
FY 2028-2029 $35,750,000,000 In 2030
FY 2029-2030 $36,510,000,000 In 2031
FY 2030-2031 $38,000,000,000 In 2032
FY 2031-2032 $38,500,000,000 In 2033
FY 2032-2033 $39,000,000,000 In 2034
(b) Withholding Tables. – The Secretary may provide tables that compute the amount of
tax due for a taxable year under this Part. The amounts of the tax determined under the tables
shall be computed on the basis of the rates prescribed by subsection (a) of this section. The tables
do not apply to an individual who files a return under section 443(a)(1) of the Code for a period
of less than 12 months due to a change in the individual's annual accounting period or to an estate
or trust."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 105-153.5(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(6a) Income earned for work performed as one of the following:
a. Firefighter.
b. Emergency medical services personnel, including the following:
1. Emergency medical responder.
2. Paramedic.
3. Rescue squad member.
c. Emergency management worker.
d. 911 call center worker.
e. Sworn law enforcement officer with the power of arrest.
f. Child care worker.
g. Public school unit employee.
h. Probation or parole officer.
i. Corrections officer."
SECTION 1.(c) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025.

BENEFITS FOR CAREGIVER WORKERS
SECTION 2.(a) For the purposes of this section, a qualifying caregiver worker is
any individual who meet both of the following requirements:
(1) Has an annual household income that does not exceed one hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000).
(2) Is employed in the State at least 30 hours a week as one of the following:
a. Firefighter.
b. Emergency medical services personnel, including the following:
1. Emergency medical responder.
2. Paramedic.
Page 2 Senate Bill 712-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
3. Rescue squad member.
c. Emergency management worker.
d. 911 call center worker.
e. Sworn law enforcement officer with the power of arrest.
f. Child care worker.
g. Public school unit employee.
h. Probation or parole officer.
i. Corrections officer.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
one hundred sixty-five million dollars ($165,000,000) recurring for each year of the 2025-2026
fiscal biennium to provide subsidized child care services to a family that includes an individual
employed as a qualifying caregiver worker. The Division of Child Development and Early
Education shall give priority to child care workers in award of these subsidies.
SECTION 2.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided herein, this act is effective when it
becomes law.
Senate Bill 712-First Edition Page 3